New York, session 2025-2026, A10806.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 382 of the executive law, as 2 amended by chapter 571 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 2. [Any person, having been served, either personally or by registered 5 or certified mail, with an order to remedy any condition found to exist 6 in, on, or about any building in violation of the uniform fire 7 prevention and building code, who shall fail to comply with such order 8 within the time fixed by the regulations promulgated by the secretary 9 pursuant to subdivision one of section three hundred eighty-one of this 10 article, such time period to be stated in the order, and] (a) Any 11 person, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or 12 corporation owning, in control of, an agent for, a tenant of, or other- 13 wise responsible for a property or building, having been served, either 14 personally or pursuant to subdivision four of section three hundred 15 eight of the civil practice law and rules, with an order to remedy any 16 condition found to exist in, on, or about the property or any building 17 on the property in violation of the uniform fire prevention and building 18 code, who fails to comply with such order within the time stated therein 19 or any owner, builder, property manager, property agent, architect, 20 tenant, contractor, subcontractor, construction superintendent or their 21 agents or any other person [taking part or assisting in the construction 22 of any building], limited liability company, limited liability partner- 23 ship, or corporation participating or assisting in either the 24 construction of any building or the maintenance, control, or oversight 25 of a property or building who [shall] knowingly [violate] violates any 26 of the applicable provisions of the uniform code or any lawful order of 27 a local government, a county or the secretary made thereunder regarding EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15350-02-6 A. 10806 2 1 standards for construction, maintenance, or fire protection [equipment 2 and systems, shall be] is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine 3 of not more than one thousand dollars per day of violation, or imprison- 4 ment not exceeding one year, or both for the first one hundred eighty 5 days, and for the following one hundred eighty days shall be punishable 6 by a fine of no less than twenty-five dollars and not more than [one] 7 two thousand dollars per day of violation or imprisonment not exceeding 8 one year, or both and thereafter shall be punishable by a fine of no 9 less than fifty dollars and not more than [one] three thousand dollars 10 per day of violation or imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both. 11 (b) Any person, limited liability company, limited liability partner- 12 ship or corporation owning, in control of, an agent for, a tenant of, or 13 otherwise responsible for a property or building, having been served, 14 either personally or pursuant to subdivision four of section three 15 hundred eight of the civil practice law and rules, with an order to 16 remedy any condition found to exist in, on, or about the property or any 17 building on the property in violation of the uniform fire prevention and 18 building code, who fails to comply with such order within the time stat- 19 ed therein or any owner, builder, property manager, property agent, 20 architect, tenant, contractor, subcontractor, construction superinten- 21 dent or their agents or any other person, limited liability company, 22 limited liability partnership, or corporation participating or assisting 23 in either the construction of any building or the maintenance, control, 24 or oversight of a property or building who violates any of the applica- 25 ble provisions of the uniform code or any lawful order of a local 26 government, a county or the secretary made thereunder regarding stand- 27 ards for construction, maintenance, or fire protection, is guilty of a 28 violation, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars 29 per day of violation, or imprisonment not exceeding fifteen days, or 30 both. 31 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 32 have become a law.